createYaml/yaml_output/VII_CNJ_aa.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaag
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaanig
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaasinog
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Neu+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaasininig
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaagiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaanigiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaasinoogiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaasininigiban
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaagwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaanigwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaasinoogwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaasininiigwen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaagobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaanigobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgProx/0PlProx: michaasinoogobanen
     michaa+VII+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Dub+0SgObv/0PlObv: michaasininigobanen
